src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
!! Verbs
! -----
!! Verbs in Somali language are actions, and also states. They agree in person
!! and number, and also gender.

LEXICON Verbs
Verb ; 

LEXICON Verb
suffixing ;

LEXICON suffixing
V1 ;
V2 ;
V3 ;

LEXICON V2
V2A ;
V2B ;

LEXICON V3
V3A ;
V3B ;
